Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202485-2706
Qualifying postsecondary institution; assist United States Defense POW/MIA Accounting Agency; grant; pilot program.

(1) The department shall implement and develop a pilot program to provide a grant to any qualifying postsecondary institution to assist the United States Defense POW/MIA Accounting Agency with accounting for United States servicemembers and civilians missing from designated past conflicts as such conflicts are determined by such federal agency. The department shall utilize available funding from the Veterans' Aid Income Fund to provide such grants and pay the costs of administering the pilot program.

(2) In order to be a qualifying postsecondary institution, the institution shall have (a) a partnership or service agreement with the United States Defense POW/MIA Accounting Agency to establish or expand undergraduate and graduate student internships to provide such assistance and (b) first received the Veteran and Active Duty Supportive designation under section 85-2703.

(3) On or before November 1, 2025, the director shall electronically submit a report to the Government, Military and Veterans Affairs Committee of the Legislature regarding the pilot program.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate two hundred thousand dollars from the Veterans' Aid Income Fund for FY2024-25 to the department for purposes of this section.

Laws 2024, LB771, § 3.
March 19, 2024